Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB326.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 278 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) For the purposes of this section, "utility" has the same meaning as in KRS
278.010(3)(a) and (b).
(2) A utility shall not disconnect residential service to a residential customer's
residence:
(a) On a day when the National Weather Service forecasts that a temperature
of thirty-two (32) degrees Fahrenheit or lower will occur at any time during
the following seventy-two (72) hour period;
(b) On a day when the National Weather Service forecasts that a temperature
of ninety-five (95) degrees Fahrenheit or greater will occur at any time
during the following seventy-two (72) hour period;
(c) For a period of thirty (30) days following the receipt of a certificate of need
from a physician, physician assistant, community-based service program, or
faith-based service program certifying that disconnection of service would
threaten the health and safety of the customer or the occupants of the
customer's household; or
(d) For nonpayment of a utility bill if the residential customer:
1. Makes a payment of not less than ten percent (10%) of the accrued
balance of the bill or two hundred dollars ($200), whichever is less;
and
2. Enters into a payment plan.
(3) Late fees shall be waived for any service termination that has been suspended due
to a certificate of need issued under subsection (2)(c) of this section.
(4) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, disconnection of utility
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 2/5/2025 12:24 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 234
service for nonpayment of a utility bill shall:
(a) Occur only between the hours of 8 a.m. and 5 p.m. Monday through
Thursday; and
(b) Not be authorized on weekends, including Fridays, or on a state or a federal
holiday.
This subsection does not apply to disconnections of utility service to protect the
health and safety of the public.
(5) A utility shall give separate final written notice, not less than fourteen (14) days
prior to any proposed disconnection of utility service, to a customer's residential
household. The notice shall:
(a) Be sent separately from the regular billing notice;
(b) Be printed on colored paper or cardstock that makes the notice easily
distinguishable from the utility's regular billing;
(c) Have the words "FINAL NOTICE OF SERVICE TERMINATION"
printed in boldface type using a font size not less than twenty-four (24)
points; and
(d) Include a toll-free number to reach a utility representative who can provide
additional information about the disconnection, including how to:
1. Obtain a certificate of need or a hardship reconnection order;
2. Make a payment or set up a payment plan;
3. File for energy cost assistance from community-based or faith-based
services;
4. Dispute a bill; and
5. Provide any other information that the commission deems necessary.
(6) A hardship reconnection order shall be granted to the customer requiring the
reestablishment of service on the same day as requested on the application for the
order, a waiver of reconnection fees, and preservation of a previous security
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 2/5/2025 12:24 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 234
deposit, if the customer:
(a) Had service terminated after the thirty (30) day suspension elapsed as
provided under subsection (2)(c) of this section; and
(b) Paid ten percent (10%) of the accrued balance of the bill or two hundred
dollars ($200), whichever is less, and entered into a payment plan for the
remaining balance.
(7) If a customer who has already been disconnected makes payment of not less than
ten percent (10%) of the accrued balance of the bill or two hundred dollars
($200), whichever is less, and enters into a payment plan for the remaining
balance, the utility shall make a reasonable effort to restore service on the same
day as payment is made but not more than twenty-four (24) hours after the
customer's payment. Reconnection fees shall be waived for a service termination
made for a customer that has a hardship reconnection order in accordance with
subsection (6) of this section.
(8) The commission shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with
KRS Chapter 13A and issue any order the commission deems necessary for
setting forth any applicable rules and procedures regarding disconnection,
certificates of need, hardship reconnection orders, and any other matters
required to implement this section.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 2/5/2025 12:24 PM Jacketed